Maine, session 132, LD468.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
AGRICULTURE, CONSERVATION AND FORESTRY, DEPARTMENT OF
Fund To Address Food Insecurity and Provide Nutrition Incentives Z329
Initiative: Provides one-time funding to the Fund To Address Food Insecurity and Provide
Nutrition Incentives to be used to match contributions from private and public sources.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $500,000
Page 1 - 132LR0635(05)